Hawaii statutes.
[§40-57.6] Duplicate bills accompanying
vouchers. Notwithstanding the requirement in sections 40-56 and 40-57 that
an original warrant voucher be accompanied by all original bills, original
warrant vouchers of any expending agency which fully utilizes the encumbrance
segment of the comptroller's accounting system referred to in section 40-2 for
obligations incurred for the purchase of materials, supplies, and incidentals,
and on account of state contracts may be accompanied by duplicates of bills
produced by the same impression as the original bills, or by means of
photography, or by other equivalent techniques which accurately reproduce the
original bills. The comptroller shall determine the acceptability of any
document submitted in lieu of an original bill, and the comptroller's
determination shall be final. [L 1984, c 129, §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next